Yamls/Pron-nekoda_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
#  The were proofread for golden standard by Larisa Ponomareva 2019-10-22
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


Pronoun – некӧда: # Negative Pronoun 'Ei kukaan / Никоторый'
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+Nom: некӧда
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+Acc: [некӧдӧ, некӧдӧс] 
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+Gen: некӧдалӧн
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+Abl: некӧдалісь
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+Dat: некӧдалӧ
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+Ins: [некӧдӧн, некӧдаӧн] 
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+Com: некӧдакӧт
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+Car: некӧдатӧг
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+Cns: некӧдала
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+Cmpr: некӧдася
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+Ine: некӧдаын
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+Ela: некӧдаись
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+Ill: некӧдаӧ
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+Apr: некӧдалань
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+Egr: некӧдасянь
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+Prl: некӧдаӧт
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+TerI: некӧдаӧдз
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+TerII: некӧдави
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+AprIne: некӧдаланьын
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+AprEla: некӧдаланись
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+AprIll: некӧдаланьӧ
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+AprEgr: некӧдаланьсянь
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+AprPrl: некӧдаланьӧт
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+AprTerI: некӧдаланьӧдз
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+AprTerII: некӧдаланьви

    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: некӧдаӧ
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: [некӧдаӧс, некӧдӧс] 
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: некӧдаӧлӧн
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+Abl+PxSg1: некӧдаӧлісь
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: некӧдаӧлӧ
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+Ins+PxSg1: некӧднам 
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+Com+PxSg1: некӧдаӧкӧт
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+Car+PxSg1: некӧдаӧтӧг
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+Cns+PxSg1: некӧдаӧла
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+Cmpr+PxSg1: некӧдаӧся
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+Ine+PxSg1: некӧдам
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+Ela+PxSg1: некӧдсим
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+Ill+PxSg1: некӧдам
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+Apr+PxSg1: [некӧдаӧлань, некӧдланям]
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+Egr+PxSg1: [некӧдаӧсянь, некӧдсяням]
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+Prl+PxSg1: [некӧдӧттям, некӧдӧттим]
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+TerI+PxSg1: [некӧдӧдззам, некӧдӧдззим]
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+TerII+PxSg1: некӧдаӧви
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+AprIne+PxSg1: [некӧдаӧланьын, некӧдланям]
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+AprEla+PxSg1: [некӧдаӧланись, некӧдланьсим]
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+AprIll+PxSg1: [некӧдаӧланьӧ, некӧдланям]
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+AprEgr+PxSg1: [некӧдаӧланьсянь, некӧдланьсяням]
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+AprPrl+PxSg1: [некӧдаӧланьӧт, некӧдланьӧттям, некӧдланьӧттим]
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+AprTerI+PxSg1: [некӧдаӧланьӧдз, некӧдланьӧдззам, некӧдланьӧдззим] 
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+AprTerII+PxSg1: некӧдаӧланьви

    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: некӧдыт
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+Acc+PxSg2: некӧдтӧ 
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: некӧдытлӧн
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+Abl+PxSg2: некӧдытлісь
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+Dat+PxSg2: некӧдытлӧ
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+Ins+PxSg2: некӧднат 
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+Com+PxSg2: некӧдыткӧт
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+Car+PxSg2: некӧдыттӧг
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+Cns+PxSg2: некӧдытла
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+Cmpr+PxSg2: некӧдытся
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+Ine+PxSg2: некӧдат
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+Ela+PxSg2: некӧдсит
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+Ill+PxSg2: некӧдат
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+Apr+PxSg2: [некӧдытлань, некӧдланят]
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+Egr+PxSg2: [некӧдытсянь, некӧдсянят]
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+Prl+PxSg2: [некӧдӧттят, некӧдӧттит]
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+TerI+PxSg2: [некӧдӧдззат, некӧдӧдззит]
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+TerII+PxSg2: некӧдытви
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+AprIne+PxSg2: [некӧдытланьын, некӧдланят]
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+AprEla+PxSg2: [некӧдытланись, некӧдланьсит]
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+AprIll+PxSg2: [некӧдытланьӧ, некӧдланят]
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+AprEgr+PxSg2: [некӧдытланьсянь, некӧдланьсянят]
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+AprPrl+PxSg2: [некӧдытланьӧт, некӧдланьӧттят, некӧдланьӧттит]
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+AprTerI+PxSg2: [некӧдытланьӧдз, некӧдланьӧдззат, некӧдланьӧдззит] 
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+AprTerII+PxSg2: некӧдытланьви


    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: некӧдыс
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+Acc+PxSg3: некӧдсӧ 
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: некӧдыслӧн
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+Abl+PxSg3: некӧдыслісь
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+Dat+PxSg3: некӧдыслӧ
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+Ins+PxSg3: некӧднас 
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+Com+PxSg3: некӧдыскӧт
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+Car+PxSg3: некӧдыстӧг
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+Cns+PxSg3: некӧдысла
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+Cmpr+PxSg3: некӧдысся
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+Ine+PxSg3: некӧдас
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+Ela+PxSg3: некӧдсис
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+Ill+PxSg3: некӧдас
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+Apr+PxSg3: [некӧдыслань, некӧдланяс]
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+Egr+PxSg3: [некӧдыссянь, некӧдсяняс]
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+Prl+PxSg3: [некӧдӧттяс, некӧдӧттис]
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+TerI+PxSg3: [некӧдӧдззас, некӧдӧдззис]
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+TerII+PxSg3: некӧдысви
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+AprIne+PxSg3: [некӧдысланьын, некӧдланяс]
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+AprEla+PxSg3: [некӧдысланись, некӧдланьсис]
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+AprIll+PxSg3: [некӧдысланьӧ, некӧдланяс]
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+AprEgr+PxSg3: [некӧдысланьсянь, некӧдланьсяняс]
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+AprPrl+PxSg3: [некӧдысланьӧт, некӧдланьӧттяс, некӧдланьӧттис]
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+AprTerI+PxSg3: [некӧдысланьӧдз, некӧдланьӧдззас, некӧдланьӧдззис] 
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+AprTerII+PxSg3: некӧдысланьви


    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: некӧдным
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+Acc+PxPl1: некӧднымӧс 
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+Gen+PxPl1: некӧднымлӧн
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+Abl+PxPl1: некӧднымлісь
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+Dat+PxPl1: некӧднымлӧ
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+Ins+PxPl1: [некӧднымӧн, некӧднаным] 
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+Com+PxPl1: некӧднымкӧт
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+Car+PxPl1: некӧднымтӧг
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+Cns+PxPl1: некӧднымла
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+Cmpr+PxPl1: некӧднымся
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+Ine+PxPl1: некӧднымын
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+Ela+PxPl1: [некӧднымись, некӧдсиным]
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+Ill+PxPl1: некӧднымӧ
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+Apr+PxPl1: [некӧднымлань, некӧдланяным]
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+Egr+PxPl1: [некӧднымсянь, некӧдсяняным]
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+Prl+PxPl1: [некӧднымӧт, некӧдӧттяным, некӧдӧттиным]
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+TerI+PxPl1: [некӧднымӧдз, некӧдӧдззаным, некӧдӧдззиным]
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+TerII+PxPl1: некӧднымви
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+AprIne+PxPl1: [некӧднымланьын, некӧдланяным]
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+AprEla+PxPl1: [некӧднымланись, некӧдланьсиным]
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+AprIll+PxPl1: [некӧднымланьӧ, некӧдланяным]
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+AprEgr+PxPl1: [некӧднымланьсянь, некӧдланьсяняным]
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+AprPrl+PxPl1: [некӧднымланьӧт, некӧдланьӧттяным, некӧдланьӧттиным]
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+AprTerI+PxPl1: [некӧднымланьӧдз, некӧдланьӧдззаным, некӧдланьӧдззиным] 
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+AprTerII+PxPl1: некӧднымланьви


    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: некӧдныт
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+Acc+PxPl2: некӧднытӧ 
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+Gen+PxPl2: некӧднытлӧн
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+Abl+PxPl2: некӧднытлісь
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+Dat+PxPl2: некӧднытлӧ
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+Ins+PxPl2: [некӧднытӧн, некӧднаныт] 
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+Com+PxPl2: некӧдныткӧт
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+Car+PxPl2: некӧдныттӧг
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+Cns+PxPl2: некӧднытла
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+Cmpr+PxPl2: некӧднытся
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+Ine+PxPl2: некӧднытын
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+Ela+PxPl2: [некӧднытісь, некӧдсиныт]
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+Ill+PxPl2: некӧднытӧ
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+Apr+PxPl2: [некӧднытлань, некӧдланяныт]
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+Egr+PxPl2: [некӧднытсянь, некӧдсяняныт]
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+Prl+PxPl2: [некӧднытӧт, некӧдӧттяныт, некӧдӧттиныт]
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+TerI+PxPl2: [некӧднытӧдз, некӧдӧдззаныт, некӧдӧдззиныт]
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+TerII+PxPl2: некӧднытви
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+AprIne+PxPl2: [некӧднытланьын, некӧдланяныт]
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+AprEla+PxPl2: [некӧднытланись, некӧдланьсиныт]
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+AprIll+PxPl2: [некӧднытланьӧ, некӧдланяныт]
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+AprEgr+PxPl2: [некӧднытланьсянь, некӧдланьсяняныт]
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+AprPrl+PxPl2: [некӧднытланьӧт, некӧдланьӧттяныт, некӧдланьӧттиныт]
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+AprTerI+PxPl2: [некӧднытланьӧдз, некӧдланьӧдззаныт, некӧдланьӧдззиныт] 
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+AprTerII+PxPl2: некӧднытланьви


    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: некӧдныс
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+Acc+PxPl3: некӧднысӧ 
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+Gen+PxPl3: некӧдныслӧн
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+Abl+PxPl3: некӧдныслісь
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+Dat+PxPl3: некӧдныслӧ
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+Ins+PxPl3: [некӧднысӧн, некӧднаныс] 
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+Com+PxPl3: некӧдныскӧт
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+Car+PxPl3: некӧдныстӧг
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+Cns+PxPl3: некӧднысла
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+Cmpr+PxPl3: некӧднысся
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+Ine+PxPl3: некӧднысын
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+Ela+PxPl3: [некӧднысісь, некӧдсиныс]
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+Ill+PxPl3: некӧднысӧ
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+Apr+PxPl3: [некӧдныслань, некӧдланяныс]
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+Egr+PxPl3: [некӧдныссянь, некӧдсяняныс]
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+Prl+PxPl3: [некӧднысӧт, некӧдӧттяныс, некӧдӧттиныс]
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+TerI+PxPl3: [некӧднысӧдз, некӧдӧдззаныс, некӧдӧдззиныс]
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+TerII+PxPl3: некӧднысви
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+AprIne+PxPl3: [некӧднысланьын, некӧдланяныс]
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+AprEla+PxPl3: [некӧднысланись, некӧдланьсиныс]
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+AprIll+PxPl3: [некӧднысланьӧ, некӧдланяныс]
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+AprEgr+PxPl3: [некӧднысланьсянь, некӧдланьсяняныс]
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+AprPrl+PxPl3: [некӧднысланьӧт, некӧдланьӧттяныс, некӧдланьӧттиныс]
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+AprTerI+PxPl3: [некӧднысланьӧдз, некӧдланьӧдззаныс, некӧдланьӧдззиныс] 
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Sg+AprTerII+PxPl3: некӧднысланьви


    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Pl+Nom: некӧдна
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Pl+Acc: [некӧднӧ, некӧднӧс] 
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Pl+Gen: некӧдналӧн
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Pl+Abl: некӧдналісь
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Pl+Dat: некӧдналӧ
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Pl+Ins: [некӧднӧн, некӧднаӧн] 
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Pl+Com: некӧднакӧт
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Pl+Car: некӧднатӧг
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Pl+Cns: некӧднала
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Pl+Cmpr: некӧднася
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Pl+Ine: некӧднаын
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Pl+Ela: некӧднаись
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Pl+Ill: некӧднаӧ
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Pl+Apr: некӧдналань
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Pl+Egr: некӧднасянь
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Pl+Prl: некӧднаӧт
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Pl+TerI: некӧднаӧдз
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Pl+TerII: некӧднави
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Pl+AprIne: некӧдналаньын
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Pl+AprEla: некӧдналанись
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Pl+AprIll: некӧдналаньӧ
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Pl+AprEgr: некӧдналаньсянь
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Pl+AprPrl: некӧдналаньӧт
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Pl+AprTerI: некӧдналаньӧдз
    некӧда+Pron+Neg+Pl+AprTerII: некӧдналаньви
